New York, session 2025-2026, A6917.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Clause (v) of subparagraph (E) of paragraph 17 of 2 subsection (i) of section 3216 of the insurance law, as amended by 3 section 3 of part M of chapter 57 of the laws of 2019, is amended to 4 read as follows: 5 (v) all FDA-approved contraceptive drugs, devices, and other products, 6 including all over-the-counter contraceptive drugs, devices, and 7 products as prescribed or as otherwise authorized under state or federal 8 law; voluntary sterilization procedures pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 18022 and 9 identified in the comprehensive guidelines supported by the health 10 resources and services administration and thereby incorporated in the 11 essential health benefits benchmark plan; patient education and coun- 12 seling on contraception; and follow-up services related to the drugs, 13 devices, products, and procedures covered under this clause, including, 14 but not limited to, management of side effects, counseling for continued 15 adherence, and device insertion and removal. Except as otherwise author- 16 ized under this clause, a contract shall not impose any restrictions or 17 delays on the coverage required under this clause. However, where the EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09936-03-5 A. 6917--A 2 1 FDA has approved one or more therapeutic and pharmaceutical equivalent, 2 as defined by the FDA, versions of a contraceptive drug, device, or 3 product, a contract is not required to include all such therapeutic and 4 pharmaceutical equivalent versions in its formulary, so long as at least 5 one is included and covered without cost-sharing and in accordance with 6 this clause. If the covered therapeutic and pharmaceutical equivalent 7 versions of a drug, device, or product are not available or are deemed 8 medically inadvisable a contract shall provide coverage for an alternate 9 therapeutic and pharmaceutical equivalent version of the contraceptive 10 drug, device, or product without cost-sharing. 11 (a) This coverage shall include emergency contraception without cost 12 sharing when provided pursuant to a prescription, or order under section 13 sixty-eight hundred thirty-one of the education law or when lawfully 14 provided over-the-counter. 15 (b) If the attending health care provider, in [his or her] their 16 reasonable professional judgment, determines that the use of a non-cov- 17 ered therapeutic or pharmaceutical equivalent of a drug, device, or 18 product is warranted, the health care provider's determination shall be 19 final. The superintendent shall promulgate regulations establishing a 20 process, including timeframes, for an insured, an insured's designee or 21 an insured's health care provider to request coverage of a non-covered 22 contraceptive drug, device, or product. Such regulations shall include a 23 requirement that insurers use an exception form that shall meet criteria 24 established by the superintendent. 25 (c) This coverage must allow for the dispensing of up to twelve months 26 worth of a contraceptive at one time. 27 (d) This coverage shall provide for reimbursement to a pharmacist who 28 dispenses self-administered hormonal contraceptives pursuant to section 29 sixty-eight hundred one of the education law and provides related 30 services the same as any other health care provider. 31 (e) For the purposes of this clause, "over-the-counter contraceptive 32 products" shall mean those products provided for in comprehensive guide- 33 lines supported by the health resources and services administration as 34 of January twenty-first, two thousand nineteen. 35 § 2. Subparagraph (A) of paragraph 16 of subsection (l) of section 36 3221 of the insurance law, as amended by section 1 of part M of chapter 37 57 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 38 (A) Every group or blanket policy that provides medical, major 39 medical, or similar comprehensive type coverage [that is issued, 40 amended, renewed, effective or delivered on or after January first, two 41 thousand twenty,] shall provide coverage for all of the following 42 services and contraceptive methods: 43 (1) All FDA-approved contraceptive drugs, devices, and other products. 44 This includes all FDA-approved over-the-counter contraceptive drugs, 45 devices, and products as prescribed or as otherwise authorized under 46 state or federal law. The following applies to this coverage: 47 (a) where the FDA has approved one or more therapeutic and pharmaceu- 48 tical equivalent, as defined by the FDA, versions of a contraceptive 49 drug, device, or product, a group or blanket policy is not required to 50 include all such therapeutic and pharmaceutical equivalent versions in 51 its formulary, so long as at least one is included and covered without 52 cost-sharing and in accordance with this paragraph; 53 (b) if the covered therapeutic and pharmaceutical equivalent versions 54 of a drug, device, or product are not available or are deemed medically 55 inadvisable a group or blanket policy shall provide coverage for an 56 alternate therapeutic and pharmaceutical equivalent version of the A. 6917--A 3 1 contraceptive drug, device, or product without cost-sharing. If the 2 attending health care provider, in [his or her] their reasonable profes- 3 sional judgment, determines that the use of a non-covered therapeutic or 4 pharmaceutical equivalent of a drug, device, or product is warranted, 5 the health care provider's determination shall be final. The superinten- 6 dent shall promulgate regulations establishing a process, including 7 timeframes, for an insured, an insured's designee or an insured's health 8 care provider to request coverage of a non-covered contraceptive drug, 9 device, or product. Such regulations shall include a requirement that 10 insurers use an exception form that shall meet criteria established by 11 the superintendent; 12 (c) this coverage shall include emergency contraception without cost- 13 sharing when provided pursuant to a prescription or order under section 14 sixty-eight hundred thirty-one of the education law or when lawfully 15 provided over the counter; [and] 16 (d) this coverage must allow for the dispensing of up to twelve months 17 worth of a contraceptive at one time; and 18 (e) this coverage shall provide for reimbursement to a pharmacist who 19 dispenses self-administered hormonal contraceptives pursuant to section 20 sixty-eight hundred one of the education law and provides related 21 services the same as any other health care provider; 22 (2) Voluntary sterilization procedures pursuant to 42 U.S.C. 18022 and 23 identified in the comprehensive guidelines supported by the health 24 resources and services administration and thereby incorporated in the 25 essential health benefits benchmark plan; 26 (3) Patient education and counseling on contraception; and 27 (4) Follow-up services related to the drugs, devices, products, and 28 procedures covered under this paragraph, including, but not limited to, 29 management of side effects, counseling for continued adherence, and 30 device insertion and removal. 31 § 3. The opening paragraph and subparagraph (A) of paragraph 1 of 32 subsection (cc) of section 4303 of the insurance law, as amended by 33 section 2 of part M of chapter 57 of the laws of 2019, are amended to 34 read as follows: 35 Every contract that provides medical, major medical, or similar 36 comprehensive type coverage [that is issued, amended, renewed, effective 37 or delivered on or after January first, two thousand twenty,] shall 38 provide coverage for all of the following services and contraceptive 39 methods: 40 (A) All FDA-approved contraceptive drugs, devices, and other products. 41 This includes all FDA-approved over-the-counter contraceptive drugs, 42 devices, and products as prescribed or as otherwise authorized under 43 state or federal law. The following applies to this coverage: 44 (i) where the FDA has approved one or more therapeutic and pharmaceu- 45 tical equivalent, as defined by the FDA, versions of a contraceptive 46 drug, device, or product, a contract is not required to include all such 47 therapeutic and pharmaceutical equivalent versions in its formulary, so 48 long as at least one is included and covered without cost-sharing and in 49 accordance with this subsection; 50 (ii) if the covered therapeutic and pharmaceutical equivalent versions 51 of a drug, device, or product are not available or are deemed medically 52 inadvisable a contract shall provide coverage for an alternate therapeu- 53 tic and pharmaceutical equivalent version of the contraceptive drug, 54 device, or product without cost-sharing. If the attending health care 55 provider, in [his or her] their reasonable professional judgment, deter- 56 mines that the use of a non-covered therapeutic or pharmaceutical equiv- A. 6917--A 4 1 alent of a drug, device, or product is warranted, the health care 2 provider's determination shall be final. The superintendent shall 3 promulgate regulations establishing a process, including timeframes, for 4 an insured, an insured's designee or an insured's health care provider 5 to request coverage of a non-covered contraceptive drug, device, or 6 product. Such regulations shall include a requirement that insurers use 7 an exception form that shall meet criteria established by the super- 8 intendent; 9 (iii) this coverage shall include emergency contraception without 10 cost-sharing when provided pursuant to a prescription or order under 11 section sixty-eight hundred thirty-one of the education law or when 12 lawfully provided over the counter; [and] 13 (iv) this coverage must allow for the dispensing of up to twelve 14 months worth of a contraceptive at one time; and 15 (v) this coverage shall include reimbursement to a pharmacist who 16 dispenses self-administered hormonal contraceptives pursuant to section 17 sixty-eight hundred one of the education law and provides related 18 services the same as any other health care provider; 19 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to poli- 20 cies and contracts issued, renewed, modified, altered or amended on and 21 after such date.